Utah statutes.
36-1-101.5.   Utah State Senate -- District boundaries.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "County boundary" means the county boundary's location in the database as of January 1, 2010.

(b)  "Database" means the State Geographic Information Database created in Section 63F-1-507.

(c)  "Local school district boundary" means the local school district boundary's location in the database as of January 1, 2010.

(d)  "Municipal boundary" means the municipal boundary's location in the database as of January 1, 2010.

(2)  The Utah State Senate shall consist of 29 members, with one member to be elected from each Utah State Senate district.

(3)  The Legislature adopts the official census population figures and maps of the Bureau of the Census of the United States Department of Commerce developed in connection with the taking of the 2010 national decennial census as the official data for establishing Senate district boundaries.

(4) (a)  Notwithstanding Subsection (3), the Legislature enacts the district numbers and boundaries of the Senate districts designated in the Senate shapefile that is the electronic component of the bill that enacts this section.

(b)  That Senate shapefile, and the Senate district boundaries generated from that Senate shapefile, may be accessed via the Utah Legislature's website.



Amended by Chapter 454, 2013 General Session

